incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="váp/no__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nu</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>no</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ne</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>no</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nom</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>no</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nam</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nach</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nami</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>na</l>
        <r>no<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ufo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufa</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufu</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufo</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufe</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufo</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufom</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufo</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úf</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufám</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufá</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufách</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufá</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufami</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ufá</l>
        <r>ufo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jed/lo__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>la</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lu</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>le</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lom</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lo</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ál</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lám</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lá</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lách</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lá</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lami</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lá</l>
        <r>lo<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/alto__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alta</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altu</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alto</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alte</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alto</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altom</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>alto</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ált</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altám</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altá</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altách</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altá</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altami</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>altá</l>
        <r>alto<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ufo"><i></i><par n="/ufo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jedlo"><i>jed</i><par n="jed/lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plátno"><i>plát</i><par n="váp/no__n"/></e>
    <e lm="predjedlo"><i>predjed</i><par n="jed/lo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="práchno"><i>prách</i><par n="váp/no__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salto"><i>s</i><par n="s/alto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="súkno"><i>súk</i><par n="váp/no__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vápno"><i>váp</i><par n="váp/no__n"/></e>
